Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.120

Publication of reports.

The reports must be published under the supervision of the court, and to that end each of the judges must be furnished by the reporter with proof sheets of each volume thirty days before its final publication.

[ 1890 p 320 s 3; RRS s 11060.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR 17.

Publication of supreme court opinions: State Constitution Art. 4 s 21.